Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.080

Uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licensure, and the discipline of persons licensed under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplinary authority under this chapter.

[ 2001 c 251 s 8.]